Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-214
City council; powers; how exercised; officers and employees; appointment; removal.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class shall possess and exercise, by itself or through such methods as the city council may provide, all executive, legislative, or judicial powers of the city, except as otherwise expressly provided by general law or sections 14-101 to 14-2004. The city council shall have the power to elect or appoint any officer and define such officer's duties, or any employee deemed necessary, and any such officer or employee elected or appointed by the city council may be removed by the city council at any time, except as otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 13 1/2, p. 428;

C.S.1922, § 3539;

C.S.1929, § 14-214;

R.S.1943, § 14-214;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 46.
July 21, 2022
The city council of a metropolitan city may exercise executive, legislative and judicial powers. Horbach v. Butler, 135 Neb. 394, 281 N.W. 804 (1938).

Where right of removal is reserved in the appointing power, without necessity of making charges, it may be exercised in discretion of appointing power, even before expiration of term. State ex rel. Gapen v. Somers, 35 Neb. 322, 53 N.W. 146 (1892).